Utah statutes.
73-28-301.   Entities eligible to receive developed water.

(1)  Except for developed water reserved for wildlife or public recreation, the board shall make the developed water available by contract exclusively to the districts listed in Subsection 73-28-103(5).

(2)  A district that purchases developed water may:

(a)  use the water directly;

(b)  exchange the water by following the procedures and requirements of Section 73-3-20; or

(c)  sell the water to any entity or person.

(3)  Districts purchasing developed water shall build any facilities necessary for the treatment and local delivery of the developed water.

